Idaho, session 2025, H0019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3008. RELEASE OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION. (1) All
units of state, city, and local governments, as well as; any agency of the
state created by the legislature which that requires by statute, rule, or lo-
cal or county ordinance, fingerprinting of applicants or licensees,; and any
persons associated with private, noncriminal justice entities that qualify
under the national child protection act of 1993 and volunteers for children
act that serve vulnerable populations such as children, the elderly, and
individuals with disabilities are authorized to submit fingerprints to the
bureau for examination and further submission, if necessary, to the fed-
eral bureau of investigation. The bureau shall be the state's sole source
of fingerprint submissions for criminal justice and applicant or licensing
purposes to the federal bureau of investigation.
(2) The department shall provide copies of or communicate information
from criminal history records to the following:
(a) Criminal justice agencies and the court;
(b) A person or public agency or private agency entity, upon written ap-
plication on a form approved by the director and provided by the depart-
ment, subject to the following restrictions:
(i) A request for criminal history records must be submitted in
writing or as provided by rule. However, the department shall ac-
cept a request presented in person by the subject of the record;
and
(ii) The request must identify a specific person by name and date
of birth. Fingerprints of the person named may be required to es-
tablish positive identification; and
(iii) Responding to the request does not interfere with the secure
and orderly conduct of the department and would not substantially
prejudice or prevent the carrying out of the functions of the de-
partment; and
(iv) A record of an arrest that does not contain a disposition af-
ter twelve (12) months from the date of arrest may only be dissem-
inated by the department to criminal justice agencies, to the sub-
ject of the record, or to a person requesting the criminal history


information with a signed release from the subject of the record;
and
(v) Any release of criminal history data by the department shall
prominently display the statement: "AN ARREST WITHOUT DISPOSI-
TION IS NOT AN INDICATION OF GUILT."
(3) Judicial review of the department's denial of a request for records
shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 74-115, Idaho Code.
(4) A request for a criminal history record by a criminal justice agency
or a court shall take precedence over all other requests. The department
shall adopt rules to set forth the manner by which criminal justice agencies
and courts without direct access to the public safety and security informa-
tion system established by section 19-5202, Idaho Code, may request Idaho
criminal history record information.
(5) Unless otherwise provided by law, access authorized under this sec-
tion to criminal history records does not create a duty upon a person, em-
ployer, private agency entity, or public agency to examine the criminal his-
tory record of an applicant, employee or volunteer.
(6) A person or private agency entity, or public agency, other than the
department, shall not disseminate criminal history record information ob-
tained from the department to a person or agency that is not a criminal jus-
tice agency or a court without a signed release of the subject of record or
unless otherwise provided by law.
(7) Direct access to criminal history record information is regulated
by chapter 52, title 19, Idaho Code, and the rules adopted pursuant to that
chapter.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.